nl: Subsonisch filter: Intelligent adaptief; Nee; Ja; Andere
cs: Subsonický filtr: Inteligentní adaptivní; Ne; Ano; Jiné
lt-LT: Subsoninis filtras: Išmanus adaptyvus; Ne; Taip; Kita
ko: 서브소닉 필터: 지능형 적응식; 아니요; 예; 기타
tr: Subsonik filtre: Akıllı uyarlanabilir; Hayır; Evet; Diğer
sv: Subsoniskt filter: Intelligent adaptiv; Nej; Ja; Övrigt
vi: Bộ lọc siêu âm: Thông minh thích ứng; Không; Có; Khác
pt-BR: Filtro subsônico: Adaptativo inteligente; Não; Sim; Outro
zh-TW: 次音波濾波器: 智慧自適應; 否; 是; 其他
bg-BG: Субсоничен филтър: Интелигентно адаптивен; Не; Да; Други
ja: サブソニックフィルター: インテリジェントアダプティブ; なし; あり; その他
ru: Инфранизкочастотный фильтр: Интеллектуальный адаптивный; Нет; Да; Другой
fr: Filtre subsonique: Adaptatif intelligent; Non; Oui; Autre
fi: Aliäänisuodatin: Älykäs mukautuva; Ei; Kyllä; Muu
th: ตัวกรองซับโซนิก: อัจฉริยะแบบปรับตัว; ไม่; ใช่; อื่นๆ
es: Filtro subsónico: Inteligente adaptativo; No; Sí; Otros
sk-SK: Subsonický filter: Inteligentný adaptívny; Nie; Áno; Iné
hu: Szubszonikus szűrő: Intelligens adaptív; Nem; Igen; Egyéb
nb: Subsonisk filter: Intelligent adaptiv; Nei; Ja; Annet
zh-CN: 亚音速滤波器: 智能自适应; 否; 是; 其他
el: Υποηχητικό φίλτρο: Έξυπνο προσαρμοστικό; Όχι; Ναι; Άλλο
pt-PT: Filtro subsónico: Adaptativo inteligente; Não; Sim; Outro
sl-SI: Podzvočni filter: Inteligentno prilagodljiv; Ne; Da; Drugo
hr-HR: Subsonični filtar: Inteligentni prilagodljivi; Ne; Da; Ostalo
en: Subsonic filter: Intelligent adaptive; No; Yes; Other
it: Filtro subsonico: Adattivo intelligente; No; Sì; Altro
de: Subsonic-Filter: Intelligent adaptiv; Nein; Ja; Sonstiges
da: Subsonisk filter: Intelligent adaptiv; Nej; Ja; Andet
ro-RO: Filtru subsonic: Adaptiv inteligent; Nu; Da; Altele
pl: Filtr subsoniczny: Inteligentny adaptacyjny; Nie; Tak; Inne